Maine, session 132, LD772.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §333, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2011, c. 648, §2, is further
amended to read:
1. Procedures. A nursing facility that voluntarily reduces the number of its licensed
beds at any time prior to July 1, 2007, for any reason except to create private rooms may
convert the beds back and thereby increase the number of nursing facility beds to no more
than the previously licensed number of nursing facility beds, after obtaining a certificate of
need in accordance with this section, as long as the nursing facility has been in continuous
operation without material change of ownership. For purposes of this section and sections
333-A and 334-A, beds voluntarily removed from service prior to July 1, 2007 and
available to be reinstated under this section are referred to as "reserved beds." Reserved
beds remain facility property until they lapse as provided for in this section or are
transferred. To reinstate reserved beds under this subsection, the nursing facility must
shall:
A. Give notice of the number of beds it is reserving no later than 30 days after the
effective date of the license reduction;
A-1. Annually provide notice to the department no later than July 1st of each year of
the nursing facility's intent to retain these reserved beds, subject to the limitations set
forth in subsection 2, paragraph B. Notice provided under this paragraph preserves the
reserved beds through June 30th of the following year. The annual notice on reserved
beds may be filed by an individual nursing facility or by multiple nursing facilities
through a membership organization approved by the department by a single filing; and
B. Obtain a certificate of need to convert beds back under section 335, except that, if
no construction is required for the conversion of beds back, the application must be
processed in accordance with subsection 2. The department in its review shall evaluate
the impact that the nursing facility beds to be converted back would have on those
existing nursing facility beds and facilities within 30 miles of the applicant's facility
and shall determine whether to approve the request based on current certificate of need
criteria and methodology.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §333, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 664, §2, is amended
to read:
A. Review of applications that meet the requirements of this section must be based on
the requirements of section 335, subsection 7, except that the determinations required
by section 335, subsection 7, paragraph B must be based on the historical costs of
operating the beds and must consider whether the projected costs are consistent with
the costs of the beds prior to closure, adjusted for inflation applications that seek to
reopen reserved beds must be approved if the projected incremental costs of reopening
and operating the reserved beds are consistent with the nursing facility's costs of
operating its other beds. Applicants are not required to demonstrate that any increases
in MaineCare costs are offset by other MaineCare savings. The costs of ongoing
operation of both the reopened beds and the complement of nursing facility beds at the
time the reserved beds are reopened must be recognized as allowable costs and
incorporated into the nursing facility's MaineCare payment rates; and
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §1720, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 242, §1, is amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR1477(01)

§1720. Nursing facility medical director reimbursement
The department shall include in its calculation of reimbursement for services provided
by a nursing facility an allowance for the cost of incurred by the facility for a medical
director in a base year amount not to exceed $10,000, with that amount being subject to an
annual cost-of-living adjustment.